Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6653HV (2) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2597 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 68A.303A Home security expenses. 1 1. a. In addition to the uses permitted under sections 2 68A.302 and 68A.303, a candidate or candidateâs committee may 3 use campaign funds to pay for installation and operation of 4 a home security system if the payment to the home security 5 provider is reasonable for the services rendered. 6 b. (1) A candidate or candidateâs committee shall not 7 expend more than three thousand dollars for the installation 8 of a home security system and shall not make more than one such 9 expenditure. 10 (2) A candidate or candidateâs committee shall not expend 11 more than one thousand two hundred dollars per year for the 12 operation of a home security system. 13 2. A candidate using campaign funds for home security 14 expenses shall keep a log detailing the date, name of the home 15 security provider, and cost for each home security expense paid 16 or owed by the campaign or candidate. Total home security 17 expenses shall be included as a line-item expense in a report 18 submitted pursuant to section 68A.402. A candidateâs log 19 of home security expenses shall be provided to the board if 20 requested during the course of an audit. The candidateâs 21 committee shall preserve a home security log for five years 22 following the submission of a report relating to the log, or 23 for three years following the dissolution of the candidateâs 24 committee. 25